District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.22

Violations of Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act (“RESPA”).

The Commissioner or Attorney General may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin or seek remedies for violations of the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974, approved December 23, 1974 (88 Stat. 1724; 12 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.).

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2163, 57 DCR 6242

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2163 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation